test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Oddsyllable adjectives. Adjectives that belong to TJIEGOS, GÅNTSAS, GALMAS, SÁJSAS, LUOBES, GIMES, LINES, OAMES, BASSTEL, DABÁR, MUTTÁK, SKÁRBAK, ALLAK, GÅBDDÅK, STUORAK, måjdås, SJÆVNNJAT, SUOHKAT, LÅSSÅT, TSIBTSA, TJALMMIS, IENNILS.

# Attribute is the same as pred.

Tests:

  Adjective - rádas: # TJIEGOS
    rádas+A+Attr: [rádas, ráda]
    rádas+A+Sg+Nom: rádas
    rádas+A+Sg+Ine: ráddasin
    rádas+A+Ess: ráddasin
    rádas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: ráddasabbo
    rádas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: ráddasamos
    rádas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ráddasappot
    rádas+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ráddasabmusit
    rádas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: ráddasappusj
    rádas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ráddasapputjit
    rádas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ráddasit
    rádas+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [rádasvuohta, rádavuohta]

  Adjective - måskas: # 
    måskas+A+Attr: måskas
    måskas+A+Sg+Nom: måskas
    måskas+A+Sg+Com: moasskasijn
    måskas+A+Ess: moasskasin
    måskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: moasskasabbo
    måskas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: moasskasamos
    måskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: moasskasappot
    måskas+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: moasskasabmusit
    måskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: moasskasappusj
    måskas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: moasskasapputjit
    måskas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: moasskasit
    måskas+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: måskasvuohta

  Adjective - råsjkas: # 
    råsjkas+A+Attr: råsjkas
    råsjkas+A+Sg+Nom: råsjkas
    råsjkas+A+Sg+Ine: roassjkasin

  Adjective - buoljas: # 
    buoljas+A+Attr: buoljas
    buoljas+A+Sg+Nom: buoljas
    buoljas+A+Sg+Ine: buolljasin

  Adjective - helkas: # 
    helkas+A+Attr: helkas
    helkas+A+Sg+Nom: helkas
    helkas+A+Sg+Ine: [hælkkasin, hälkkasin]

  Adjective - gievdas: # 
    gievdas+A+Attr: gievdas
    gievdas+A+Sg+Nom: gievdas
    gievdas+A+Sg+Ine: gievddasin

  Adjective - surmas: # 
    surmas+A+Attr: surmas
    surmas+A+Sg+Nom: surmas
    surmas+A+Sg+Ine: surmmasin

  Adjective - dievas: # TJIEGOS and GALMAS
    dievas+A+Attr: [dievas, dievva]
    dievas+A+Sg+Nom: dievas
    dievas+A+Sg+Gen: dievvasa
    dievas+A+Sg+Acc: dievvasav
    dievas+A+Sg+Ill: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Sg+Ine: dievvasin
    dievas+A+Sg+Ela: dievvasis
    dievas+A+Sg+Com: dievvasijn
    dievas+A+Pl+Nom: dievvasa
    dievas+A+Pl+Gen: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Pl+Acc: dievvasijt
    dievas+A+Pl+Ill: dievvasijda
    dievas+A+Pl+Ine: dievvasijn
    dievas+A+Pl+Ela: dievvasijs
    dievas+A+Pl+Com: dievvasij
    dievas+A+Ess: dievvasin
    dievas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dievvasabbo
    dievas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dievvasamos
    dievas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dievvasit

  Adjective - vijdes: # TJIEGOS
    vijdes+A+Attr: vijdes
    vijdes+A+Sg+Nom: vijdes
    vijdes+A+Sg+Gen: vijddása
    vijdes+A+Ess: vijddásin
    vijdes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vijddásabbo
    vijdes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: vijddásamos

  Adjective - vájves: # TJIEGOS
    vájves+A+Attr: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Nom: vájves
    vájves+A+Sg+Gen: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Sg+Acc: vájvvásav
    vájves+A+Sg+Ill: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Sg+Ine: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Sg+Ela: vájvvásis
    vájves+A+Sg+Com: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Nom: vájvvása
    vájves+A+Pl+Gen: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Pl+Acc: vájvvásijt
    vájves+A+Pl+Ill: vájvvásijda
    vájves+A+Pl+Ine: vájvvásijn
    vájves+A+Pl+Ela: vájvvásijs
    vájves+A+Pl+Com: vájvvásij
    vájves+A+Ess: vájvvásin
    vájves+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vájvvásabbo
    vájves+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: vájvvásamos

  Adjective - divtes: # TJIEGOS
    divtes+A+Attr: divtes
    divtes+A+Sg+Nom: divtes
    divtes+A+Sg+Acc: diktásav
    divtes+A+Ess: diktásin
    divtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: diktásabbo
    divtes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: diktásamos
    divtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: diktásappot
    divtes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: diktásabmusit
    divtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: diktásappusj
    divtes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: diktásapputjit
    divtes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: diktásit
    divtes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: divtesvuohta

  Adjective - gájkviekses: # 
    gájkviekses+A+Attr: gájkviekses
    gájkviekses+A+Sg+Nom: gájkviekses
    gájkviekses+A+Sg+Ine: [gájkvæksásin, gájkvæksán, gájkväksásin, gájkväksán]

  Adjective - tjoaskes: # TJIEGOS
    tjoaskes+A+Attr: tjoaskes
    tjoaskes+A+Sg+Nom: tjoaskes
    tjoaskes+A+Sg+Com: tjoasskásijn
    tjoaskes+A+Ess: tjoasskásin
    tjoaskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásabbo
    tjoaskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásamos
    tjoaskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjoasskásappot
    tjoaskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjoasskásabmusit
    tjoaskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: tjoasskásappusj
    tjoaskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjoasskásapputjit
    tjoaskes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjoasskásit
    tjoaskes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: tjoaskesvuohta

  Adjective - sáltes: # TJIEGOS and SÁDNES
    sáltes+A+Attr: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Sg+Nom: sáltes
    sáltes+A+Ess: [sálltán, sálltásin]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [sálltáp, sálltásabbo]
    sáltes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [sálltámus, sálltásamos]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltábut, sálltásappot]
    sáltes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltámusát, sálltásabmusit]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [sálltábusj, sálltásappusj]
    sáltes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltábuttjat, sálltásapputjit]
    sáltes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sálltát, sálltásit]
    sáltes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: sáltesvuohta

  Adjective - guojttis: # 
    guojttis+A+Attr: [guojttis, guojttisis]
    guojttis+A+Sg+Nom: guojttis
    guojttis+A+Sg+Acc: guojttisav
    guojttis+A+Ess: guojttisin
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: guojttisabbo
    guojttis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: guojttisamos
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisappot
    guojttis+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisabmusit
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: guojttisappusj
    guojttis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisapputjit
    guojttis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guojttisit
    guojttis+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [guojttisvuohta, guojttisisvuohta]

  Adjective - goasvos: # TJIEGOS and GOAVSOS
    goavsos+A+Attr: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Nom: goavsos
    goavsos+A+Sg+Gen: [goaksu,goaksusa]
    goavsos+A+Ess: [goaksun, goaksusin]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [goaksup,goaksusabbo]
    goavsos+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [goaksumus,goaksusamos]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksubut, goaksusappot]
    goavsos+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksumusát, goaksusabmusit]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [goaksubusj, goaksusappusj]
    goavsos+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksubuttjat, goaksusapputjit]
    goavsos+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [goaksut, goaksusit]
    goavsos+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: goavsosvuohta




  Adjective - báhkas: # GALMAS
    báhkas+A+Attr: báhkka
    báhkas+A+Sg+Nom: báhkas
    báhkas+A+Sg+Acc: báhkkasav
    báhkas+A+Ess: báhkkasin
    báhkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: báhkkasabbo
    báhkas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: báhkkasamos
    báhkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: báhkkasappot
    báhkas+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: báhkkasabmusit
    báhkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: báhkkasappusj
    báhkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: báhkkasapputjit
    báhkas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: báhkkasit
    báhkas+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: báhkkavuohta

  Adjective - gimás: # GALMAS
    gimás+A+Attr: gibma
    gimás+A+Sg+Nom: gimás
    gimás+A+Sg+Acc: gibmasav
    gimás+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gibmasabbo
    gimás+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gibmasamos
    gimás+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gibmasappot
    gimás+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gibmasabmusit
    gimás+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gibmasappusj
    gimás+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gibmasapputjit
    gimás+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gibmasit
    gimás+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gibmavuohta

  Adjective - tjåmås: # GALMAS
    tjåmås+A+Attr: [tjåbmå, tjåmo]
    tjåmås+A+Sg+Nom: tjåmås
    tjåmås+A+Sg+Acc: tjåbmåsav
    tjåmås+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: tjåbmåsabbo
    tjåmås+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: tjåbmåsamos
    tjåmås+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjåbmåsappot
    tjåmås+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjåbmåsabmusit
    tjåmås+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: tjåbmåsappusj
    tjåmås+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjåbmåsapputjit
    tjåmås+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjåbmåsit
    tjåmås+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [tjåbmåvuohta, tjåmovuohta]]

  Adjective - sájsas: # SÁJSAS
    sájsas+A+Attr: sájsse
    sájsas+A+Sg+Nom: sájsas
    sájsas+A+Sg+Ine: sájssasin
    sájsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: sájssasabbo
    sájsas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: sájssasamos
    sájsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: sájssasappusj
    sájsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sájssasapputjit
    sájsas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sájssasappot
    sájsas+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sájssasabmusit
    sájsas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sájssasit
    sájsas+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: sájssevuohta

  Adjective - snáves: # LUOBES and TJIEGOS
    snáves+A+Attr: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Nom: snáves
    snáves+A+Sg+Acc: [snávvásav]
    snáves+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [snávvásabbo]
    snáves+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [ snávvásamos]
    snáves+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [snávvásappot]
    snáves+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [snávvásabmusit]
    snáves+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [snávvásappusj]
    snáves+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ snávvásapputjit]
    snáves+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [snávvásit]
    snáves+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: snávesvuohta

  Adjective - luobes: # LUOBES
    luobes+A+Attr: luobes
    luobes+A+Sg+Nom: luobes
    luobes+A+Sg+Acc: luohpasav
    luobes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: luohpasabbo
    luobes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: luohpasamos

  Adjective - gimes: # 
    gimes+A+Attr: gibma
    gimes+A+Sg+Nom: gimes
    gimes+A+Sg+Acc: gibmásav
    gimes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gibmásabbo
    gimes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gibmásamos

  Adjective - dimes: # GIMES and LINES
    dimes+A+Attr: dibma
    dimes+A+Sg+Nom: dimes
    dimes+A+Sg+Acc: dibmásav
    dimes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dibmásabbo
    dimes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [ dibmásamos]
    dimes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [dibmásappot]
    dimes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ dibmásabmusit]
    dimes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [dibmásappusj]
    dimes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ dibmásapputjit]
    dimes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [dibmásit]
    dimes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: dibmavuohta

  Adjective - vánes: # LINES and  LEXATTR
    vánes+A+Attr: [vánes, vádna]
    vánes+A+Sg+Nom: vánes
    vánes+A+Sg+Gen: vádnása
    vánes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vádnásabbo
    vánes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: vádnásamos

  Adjective - suvres: # LINES and SUVRES
    suvres+A+Attr: suvra
    suvres+A+Sg+Nom: suvres
    suvres+A+Sg+Gen: [suvrrá, suvrrása]
    suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [suvrráp, suvrrásabbo]
    suvres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [suvrrámus, suvrrásamos]
    suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [suvrrábut, suvrrásappot]
    suvres+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [suvrrámusát, suvrrásabmusit]
    suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [suvrrábusj, suvrrásappusj]
    suvres+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [suvrrábuttjat, suvrrásapputjit]
    suvres+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [suvrrát, suvrrásit]
    suvres+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: suvravuohta
